Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319.05
Domestic companies; securities; deposit; aggregate required.

Every domestic insurer and assessment association required by Chapter 44 to deposit securities with the Department of Insurance shall continue to deposit all of its eligible securities until they aggregate the sum of one hundred thousand dollars.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 5, p. 499;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 97.